Louisiana, session 2026, HB377.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Subparagraphs (9)(a) and (b) of Article XIV, Section 15.1 of the 1921
Constitution of Louisiana, as amended, continued as a statute pursuant to the provisions of
Article X, Section 18 of the 1974 Constitution of Louisiana are hereby amended and
reenacted to read as follows:
§15.1. Fire and police civil service; municipalities of 13,000 to 250,000
* * *
9. State Examiner and Deputy State Examiner of Municipal Fire and Police
Civil Service.
a. The office of state examiner of municipal fire and police civil service is
created. The state examiner shall be a resident and qualified voter of the state. He
shall be a person who has had experience in personnel administration, classification,
or employment testing in a classified civil service system and shall serve on a full-
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 377 ENROLLED
time basis. He shall receive and be paid a salary set by the State Civil Service
Commission in accordance with the State Civil Service Commission's uniform pay
plan. The position of state examiner shall be assigned to the same pay range to
which the deputy director of state civil service is assigned. The state examiner shall
be paid traveling and living expenses while away from his place of residence.
b. The office of deputy state examiner of municipal fire and police civil
service is created. The right of appointment, supervision, and discharge of the
deputy state examiner is vested in the state examiner. The deputy state examiner is
authorized and empowered to exercise the authority and perform the duties of the
state examiner as provided in this Section. He shall be a resident and qualified voter
of the state. He shall be a person who has had experience in personnel
administration, classification, or employment testing in a classified civil service
system and shall serve on a full-time basis. He shall receive and be paid a salary set
by the state examiner in accordance with the State Civil Service Commission's
uniform pay plan. The position of deputy state examiner shall be assigned to the pay
range which is two levels below the pay range to which the deputy director of state
civil service is assigned. The deputy state examiner shall be paid traveling and living
expenses while away from the place of his residence.
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 33:2479(D) and (H) are hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
§2479. State examiner of municipal fire and police civil service
* * *
D. The state examiner shall serve on a full-time basis. He shall receive and
be paid a salary set by the State Civil Service Commission in accordance with the
State Civil Service Commission's uniform pay plan. The position of state examiner
shall be assigned to the same pay range to which the deputy director of state civil
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 377 ENROLLED
service is assigned. The state examiner shall be paid for his traveling and living
expenses while away from his place of residence.
* * *
H. The office of deputy state examiner of municipal fire and police civil
service is created. The right of appointment, supervision, and discharge of the
deputy state examiner shall be vested in the state examiner. The deputy state
examiner is authorized and empowered to exercise the authority and perform the
duties of the state examiner as provided in this Part or Part III of this Chapter. The
deputy state examiner shall receive and be paid a salary set by the state examiner in
accordance with the State Civil Service Commission's uniform pay plan. The
position of deputy state examiner shall be assigned to the pay range which shall be
two levels below the pay range to which the deputy director of state civil service is
assigned. The deputy state examiner shall be paid traveling and living expenses
while away from the place of his residence.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.